Tennessee, session 114, SB2447.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-2-401(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(5) Graduation from Engineering Technology Curriculum, Experience, and
Examination. A graduate of an ABET ETAC accredited engineering technology
curriculum of four (4) years or more who is approved by the board as being of
satisfactory standing; who submits written professional references from three (3)
engineers currently registered in this state who are in good standing with the board; and
who passes an examination prepared by the National Council of Examiners for
Engineering and Surveying involving the fundamentals of engineering, must be admitted
to an examination prepared by the National Council of Examiners for Engineering and
Surveying in the principles and practice of engineering. Upon passing the examinations
and with a specific record of eight (8) years or more of progressive experience on
engineering projects under the supervision of a licensed professional engineer of a
grade and character that indicates to the board that the applicant may be competent to
practice engineering , the applicant must be granted a certificate of registration to
practice engineering in this state; provided, that the applicant is otherwise qualified.
SECTION 2. For the purpose of promulgating rules, this act takes effect upon becoming
a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect July 1, 2026,
the public welfare requiring it.
SB2447
012057
- 1 -